Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4013 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Medicaid Program shall reimburse for prenatal,
delivery, and postpartum services separately in lieu of a global
payment or an all-inclusive payment methodology for maternity
services.
B. Prenatal, delivery, and postpartum services include without
limitation:
1. Office visits;
2. Laboratory fees;
3. Physician-ordered testing;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3904 Page 1

4. Blood work;
5. Fetal nonstress tests; and
6. Continuous glucose monitors or other services for
gestational diabetes, when medically necessary.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate











ENGR. H. B. NO. 3904 Page 2